Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201421-245
Share options and other awards.

(MBCA 6.24) (a) A corporation
may issue rights, options, or warrants for the purchase of shares or other
securities of the corporation. The board of directors shall determine (1)
the terms upon which the rights, options, or warrants are issued and (2) the
terms, including the consideration for which the shares or other securities
are to be issued. The authorization by the board of directors for the corporation
to issue such rights, options, or warrants constitutes authorization of the
issuance of the shares or other securities for which the rights, options,
or warrants are exercisable.

(b) The terms and conditions
of such rights, options, or warrants, including those outstanding on January
1, 2016, may include, without limitation, restrictions or conditions that:

(1) Preclude or limit the
exercise, transfer, or receipt of such rights, options, or warrants by any
person or persons owning or offering to acquire a specified number or percentage
of the outstanding shares or other securities of the corporation or by any
transferee or transferees of any such person or persons; or

(2) Invalidate or void such
rights, options, or warrants held by any such person or persons or any such
transferee or transferees.

(c)
The board of directors may authorize one or more officers to (1) designate
the recipients of rights, options, warrants, or other equity compensation
awards that involve the issuance of shares and (2) determine, within an amount
and subject to any other limitations established by the board and, if applicable,
the stockholders, the number of such rights, options, warrants, or other equity
compensation awards and the terms thereof to be received by the recipients,
except that an officer may not use such authority to designate himself or
herself or any other persons as the board of directors may specify as a recipient
of such rights, options, warrants, or other equity compensation awards.

Laws 2014, LB749, § 45.
January 1, 2017